Utah statutes.
61-2d-109.   Copies.
The lender shall provide, at no cost to the borrower, a complete set of all
documents pertaining to the transaction, including copies of all documents to
be executed or recorded and any loan documents changed at the closing:
(1)  at the time of the closing if done in person; or
(2)  no later than three business days from the closing if done by mail or any
other format.
